California, session 20252026, AB833.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 44612 of the Education Code is amended to read:44612. (a) (1) The state board shall adopt rules and regulations under which teachers employed by California local educational agencies may exchange positions with teachers in schools in other countries, including Mexico, for a period of one year or less. The arrangements for the exchanges shall be made through the department and in cooperation with the teacher exchange programs administered by agencies of the federal government.(2) The rules and regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall authorize J-1 visa sponsors designated by the United States Department of State, in addition to the department, to sponsor teachers from Mexico for placement in California local educational agencies to promote cultural exchange for both of the following purposes:(A) To foster cross-cultural understanding by allowing Mexican teachers to share their knowledge, traditions, and teaching methodologies with pupils and educators in California.(B) To provide participating teachers with firsthand experience in the United States education system, strengthening international collaboration and encouraging mutual appreciation of diverse educational approaches and cultural perspectives. (b) Grants from the federal government or any department or agency thereof may be accepted by the state and its agencies to be expended pursuant to the programs and plans enumerated in this article. The department shall administer the teacher exchange program provided for in this article and shall do all acts necessary to carry out the purposes of this article.(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.